Hawaii statutes.
§653-3 Exemptions; pensions. No
pension to which any person is entitled from the State, or any municipal
subdivision thereof, shall be subject to taxes nor to garnishment, attachment,
or execution upon or in any suit, action, or proceeding at law instituted by
any person or by the State or by any municipal subdivision thereof. [L 1921, c
66, §1; RL 1925, §2846; RL 1935, §4291; RL 1945, §10323; RL 1955, §238-3; HRS
§653-3]

Cross References

Garnishment proceedings against the retirement system, see
§88-92.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next